Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3405
Petition; contents; election; when held.

The petition calling for a budget limitation election and the election notice shall refer to section 77-3402, state the percentage limitation placed on the budget for the ensuing two years, and specify the first year for which such limitation is applicable. All elections held pursuant to section 77-3402 or 77-3410 shall be held at least ninety days prior to the date on which the fiscal year of the affected political subdivision begins and shall affect the budgets for the fiscal years specified subsequent to such election, except that elections for which petitions have been completed prior to April 11, 1981, shall not be subject to such ninety-day limitation but shall be held prior to August 15, 1981.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 17, § 3.